Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [171.397] FLEXIBLE INSTRUCTION PERMITTED. new text end new text begin A student may receive a combination of online driver's education instruction under section 171.396, teleconference driver's education instruction under section 171.395, and classroom instruction if: new text end new text begin (1) the instruction is from a single licensed or authorized driver's education provider; new text end new text begin (2) the classroom instruction curriculum is identical between the online, teleconference, and in-person settings; and new text end new text begin (3) the driver's education provider is authorized by the commissioner to provide students at least two methods of classroom instruction under the requirements of this chapter and Minnesota Rules, chapter 7411, or successor rules. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, for driver's education instruction commenced on or after that date. new text end